Massachusetts, session 194th, S1090.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 58A of chapter 276, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended
by inserting after subsection (8) the following subsection:-
(9) If an individual is charged for the second time with an offense listed in subsection (1)
the commonwealth shall move, based on dangerousness, for an order of pretrial detention under
subsection (3) or release on conditions under subsection (2).
of 1